Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201281-2004.04
Funds and accounts; records; report;
accounting.

(1) For
the purpose of establishing and maintaining legislative oversight and accountability,
the Nebraska State Patrol shall maintain records of all expenditures, disbursements,
and transfers of cash from the Nebraska State Patrol Cash Fund and the Investigation
Petty Cash Fund.

(2) By September
15 of each year, the patrol shall report to the budget division of the Department
of Administrative Services and the Legislative Fiscal Analyst the unexpended
balance existing on June 30 of the previous fiscal year relating to investigative
expenses in (a) the Nebraska State Patrol
Cash Fund, (b) the Investigation Petty
Cash Fund, (c) any special checking account
or accounts used by the patrol in carrying out the duties specified in section
81-2004.02, and (d) any funds existing on
June 30 of the previous fiscal year in the possession of personnel of the
patrol involved in investigations. The
report submitted to the Legislative Fiscal Analyst shall be submitted electronically.

(3) The Legislature
may require a separate accounting of the investigation funds according to
specific types of investigations.

Laws 1986, LB 851, § 3;

Laws 2012, LB782, § 210.
July 19, 2012